Tennessee, session 114, SB0430.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. The department of revenue is urged to study the potential economic
impact of making all franchise and excise tax credits transferable to any person or entity other
than the entity to whom or to which the credits are initially made available pursuant to the
statute creating the credit. If such study is conducted, on or before January 1, 2026, then the
department shall report its findings and recommendations to the finance, ways and means
committee of the senate and the committee in the house of representatives having jurisdiction
over tax-related matters.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0430
001723
- 1 -